sk-SK: Tvar toalety: Predĺžený; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Iné
th: รูปร่างโถสุขภัณฑ์: ยาวรี; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; อื่นๆ
fi: WC-istuimen muoto: Pitkänomainen; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Muu
lt-LT: Unitazo forma: Pailgas; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Kita
sl-SI: Oblika stranišča: Podaljšana; Pravokotno; Okrogel; Drugo
nb: Toalettfasong: Forlenget; Rektangulær; Rund; Annet
fr: Forme des toilettes: Allongé; Rectangulaire; Rond; Autre
de: Form der Toilette: Länglich; Rechteckig; Rund; Sonstiges
pl: Kształt toalety: Wydłużony; Prostokątna; Runda; Inne
ja: トイレの形状: エロンゲーテッド; 長方形; ラウンド; その他
el: Σχήμα λεκάνης τουαλέτας: Επίμηκες; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Άλλο
ro-RO: Formă vas de toaletă: Alungită; Dreptunghiulară; Rotundă; Altele
ru: Форма унитаза: Удлиненный; Прямоугольный; Круглый; Другой
pt-PT: Formato da retrete: Alongado; Retangular; Redondo; Outro
zh-TW: 馬桶形狀: 加長型; 長方形; 圓頭; 其他
en: Toilet shape: Elongated; Rectangular; Round; Other
it: Forma del water: Allungata; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Altro
sv: Toalettform: Förlängd; Rektangulär; Rund; Övrigt
vi: Hình dạng nhà vệ sinh: Hình thuôn dài; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày tròn; Khác
tr: Tuvalet şekli: İnce uzun; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Diğer
hu: Vécé forma: Hosszúkás; Téglalap; Kerek; Egyéb
cs: Tvar toalety: Podlouhlý; Obdélníkový; Oválná; Jiné
bg-BG: Форма на тоалетна: Удължена; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Други
nl: Vorm toilet: Langwerpig; Rechthoekig; Rond; Andere
pt-BR: Formato do banheiro: Alongado; Retangular; Redondo; Outro
ko: 변기 모양: 길쭉한; 직사각형; 라운드; 기타
es: Forma del inodoro: Alargado; Rectangular; Redondo; Otros
da: Toiletform: Forlænget; Rektangulær; Rund; Andet
zh-CN: 马桶形状: 拉长; 矩形; 圆头; 其他
hr-HR: Oblik toaletne školjke: Izduženi; Pravokutni; Okrugli; Ostalo